Washington statutes.
RCW 41.72.050

Law enforcement medal of honor—Design.

The decoration of the state law enforcement medal of honor shall be bronze and shall consist of a police shield overlaid by a sheriff's star with the seal of the state of Washington in the center and the words "law enforcement medal of honor" within the design and suspended from a ring attached by either a navy blue ribbon with a gold edge or a green ribbon with a gold edge. Such color choice shall be the recipient's. The reverse of the decoration shall be inscribed with the words "For exceptionally honorable and meritorious conduct in performing services as a law enforcement officer."

[ 1994 c 89 s 5.]